Washington statutes.
RCW 19.16.120

Unprofessional conduct—Support order, noncompliance.

In addition to other provisions of this chapter, and the unprofessional conduct described in RCW 18.235.130, the following conduct, acts, or conditions constitute unprofessional conduct:

(1) If an individual applicant or licensee is less than eighteen years of age or is not a resident of this state.

(2) If an applicant or licensee is not authorized to do business in this state.

(3) If the application or renewal forms required by this chapter are incomplete, fees required under RCW 19.16.140 and 19.16.150, if applicable, have not been paid, and the surety bond or cash deposit or other negotiable security acceptable to the director required by RCW 19.16.190, if applicable, has not been filed or renewed or is canceled.

(4) If any individual applicant, owner, officer, director, or managing employee of a nonindividual applicant or licensee:

(a) Has had any judgment entered against him or her in any civil action involving forgery, embezzlement, obtaining money under false pretenses, larceny, extortion, or conspiracy to defraud and five years have not elapsed since the date of the entry of the final judgment in said action: PROVIDED, That in no event shall a license be issued unless the judgment debt has been discharged;

(b) Has had his or her license to practice law suspended or revoked and two years have not elapsed since the date of such suspension or revocation, unless he or she has been relicensed to practice law in this state;

(c) Has had any judgment entered against such a person under the provisions of RCW 19.86.080 or 19.86.090 involving a violation or violations of RCW 19.86.020 and two years have not elapsed since the entry of the final judgment: PROVIDED, That in no event shall a license be issued unless the terms of such judgment, if any, have been fully complied with: PROVIDED FURTHER, That said judgment shall not be grounds for denial, suspension, nonrenewal, or revocation of a license unless the judgment arises out of and is based on acts of the applicant, owner, officer, director, managing employee, or licensee while acting for or as a collection agency or an out-of-state collection agency;

(d) Has petitioned for bankruptcy, and two years have not elapsed since the filing of the petition;

(e) Is insolvent in the sense that the person's liabilities exceed the person's assets or in the sense that the person cannot meet obligations as they mature;

(f) Has failed to pay any civil, monetary penalty assessed in accordance with RCW 19.16.351 within ten days after the assessment becomes final;

(g) Has failed to comply with, or violated any provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation issued pursuant to this chapter, and two years have not elapsed since the occurrence of said noncompliance or violation; or

(h) Has been found by a court of competent jurisdiction to have violated the federal fair debt collection practices act, 15 U.S.C. Sec. 1692 et seq., or the Washington state consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW, and two years have not elapsed since that finding.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, any person who is engaged in the collection agency business as of January 1, 1972, shall, upon filing the application, paying the fees, and filing the surety bond or cash deposit or other negotiable security in lieu of bond required by this chapter, be issued a license under this chapter.

The director shall immediately suspend the license or certificate of a person who has been certified pursuant to RCW 74.20A.320 by the department of social and health services as a person who is not in compliance with a support order. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for reinstatement during the suspension, reissuance of the license or certificate shall be automatic upon the director's receipt of a release issued by the department of social and health services stating that the licensee is in compliance with the order.

[ 2002 c 86 s 266; 1997 c 58 s 847; 1994 c 195 s 3; 1977 ex.s. c 194 s 1; 1973 1st ex.s. c 20 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 253 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2002 c 86: See note following RCW 18.08.340.

Part headings not law—Severability—2002 c 86: See RCW 18.235.902 and 18.235.903.

Short title—Part headings, captions, table of contents not law—Exemptions and waivers from federal law—Conflict with federal requirements—Severability—1997 c 58: See RCW 74.08A.900 through 74.08A.904.

Effective dates—Intent—1997 c 58: See notes following RCW 74.20A.320.